Rhode Island, session 2026, SB3022.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 27-18 of the General Laws entitled "Accident and Sickness Insurance
Policies" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-18-96. Access to pain management services.
(a) Every individual or group health insurance contract, plan, or policy that provides
prescription coverage and that is delivered, issued for delivery, prescribed, or renewed in this state
on or after January 1, 2027, shall develop a plan to provide adequate coverage of and access to a
broad spectrum of pain management services including, but not limited to, nonopioid, nonnarcotic
medication for pain management and nonmedication pain management services that serve as
alternatives to the prescribing of opioid or narcotic drugs in accordance with guidelines developed
by the department of health.
(b)(1) Approval by department of health. Every individual or group health insurance carrier
shall file a plan required under subsection (a) of this section with the director for approval. In its
review, the director shall consider the adequacy of access to a broad spectrum of pain management
services under the plan and whether any policies adopted by the carrier may create unduly
preferential coverage of and access to prescribed opioids for pain management without
consideration of other pain management services.
(2) No individual or group health insurance contract, plan, or policy that provides
prescription coverage and that is delivered, issued for delivery, prescribed, or renewed in this state
on or after January 1, 2027 shall apply any utilization review, including without limitation, prior

authorization or step therapy protocols, for clinically appropriate nonopioid prescription drugs
approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration for the treatment or management of
moderate to severe pain, that is more restrictive or extensive than the least restrictive or extensive
utilization review applicable to any clinically appropriate opioid or narcotic drug.
(c) Information for enrollees. Every individual or group health insurance carrier shall
distribute educational materials to network providers about a pain management access plan under
subsection (a) of this section and post information about the pain management access plan on the
carrier's publicly accessible website.
SECTION 2. Chapter 27-19 of the General Laws entitled "Nonprofit Hospital Service
Corporations" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-19-88. Access to pain management services.
(a) Every individual or group health insurance contract, plan, or policy that provides
prescription coverage and that is delivered, issued for delivery, prescribed, or renewed in this state
on or after January 1, 2027, shall develop a plan to provide adequate coverage of and access to a
broad spectrum of pain management services including, but not limited to, nonopioid, nonnarcotic
medication for pain management and nonmedication pain management services that serve as
alternatives to the prescribing of opioid or narcotic drugs in accordance with guidelines developed
by the department of health.
(b)(1) Approval by department of health. Every individual or group health insurance carrier
shall file a plan required under subsection (a) of this section with the director for approval. In its
review, the director shall consider the adequacy of access to a broad spectrum of pain management
services under the plan and whether any policies adopted by the carrier may create unduly
preferential coverage of and access to prescribed opioids for pain management without
consideration of other pain management services.
(2) No individual or group health insurance contract, plan, or policy that provides
prescription coverage and that is delivered, issued for delivery, prescribed, or renewed in this state
on or after January 1, 2027 shall apply any utilization review, including without limitation, prior
authorization or step therapy protocols, for clinically appropriate nonopioid prescription drugs
approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration for the treatment or management of
moderate to severe pain, that is more restrictive or extensive than the least restrictive or extensive
utilization review applicable to any clinically appropriate opioid or narcotic drug.
(c) Information for enrollees. Every individual or group health insurance carrier shall
distribute educational materials to network providers about a pain management access plan under
subsection (a) of this section and post information about the pain management access plan on the
LC005923/SUB A - Page 2 of 6

carrier's publicly accessible website.
SECTION 3. Chapter 27-20 of the General Laws entitled "Nonprofit Medical Service
Corporations" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-20-84. Access to pain management services.
(a) Every individual or group health insurance contract, plan, or policy that provides
prescription coverage and that is delivered, issued for delivery, prescribed, or renewed in this state
on or after January 1, 2027, shall develop a plan to provide adequate coverage of and access to a
broad spectrum of pain management services including, but not limited to, nonopioid, nonnarcotic
medication for pain management and nonmedication pain management services that serve as
alternatives to the prescribing of opioid or narcotic drugs in accordance with guidelines developed
by the department of health.
(b)(1) Approval by department of health. Every individual or group health insurance carrier
shall file a plan required under subsection (a) of this section with the director for approval. In its
review, the director shall consider the adequacy of access to a broad spectrum of pain management
services under the plan and whether any policies adopted by the carrier may create unduly
preferential coverage of and access to prescribed opioids for pain management without
consideration of other pain management services.
(2) No individual or group health insurance contract, plan, or policy that provides
prescription coverage and that is delivered, issued for delivery, prescribed, or renewed in this state
on or after January 1, 2027 shall apply any utilization review, including without limitation, prior
authorization or step therapy protocols, for clinically appropriate nonopioid prescription drugs
approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration for the treatment or management of
moderate to severe pain, that is more restrictive or extensive than the least restrictive or extensive
utilization review applicable to any clinically appropriate opioid or narcotic drug.
(c) Information for enrollees. Every individual or group health insurance carrier shall
distribute educational materials to network providers about a pain management access plan under
subsection (a) of this section and post information about the pain management access plan on the
carrier's publicly accessible website.
SECTION 4. Chapter 27-41 of the General Laws entitled "Health Maintenance
Organizations" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-41-101. Access to pain management services.
(a) Every individual or group health insurance contract, plan, or policy that provides
prescription coverage and that is delivered, issued for delivery, prescribed, or renewed in this state
on or after January 1, 2027, shall develop a plan to provide adequate coverage of and access to a
LC005923/SUB A - Page 3 of 6

broad spectrum of pain management services including, but not limited to, nonopioid, nonnarcotic
medication for pain management and nonmedication pain management services that serve as
alternatives to the prescribing of opioid or narcotic drugs in accordance with guidelines developed
by the department of health.
(b)(1) Approval by department of health. Every individual or group health insurance carrier
shall file a plan required under subsection (a) of this section with the director for approval. In its
review, the director shall consider the adequacy of access to a broad spectrum of pain management
services under the plan and whether any policies adopted by the carrier may create unduly
preferential coverage of and access to prescribed opioids for pain management without
consideration of other pain management services.
(2) No individual or group health insurance contract, plan, or policy that provides
prescription coverage and that is delivered, issued for delivery, prescribed, or renewed in this state
on or after January 1, 2027 shall apply any utilization review, including without limitation, prior
authorization or step therapy protocols, for clinically appropriate nonopioid prescription drugs
approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration for the treatment or management of
moderate to severe pain, that is more restrictive or extensive than the least restrictive or extensive
utilization review applicable to any clinically appropriate opioid or narcotic drug.
(c) Information for enrollees. Every individual or group health insurance carrier shall
distribute educational materials to network providers about a pain management access plan under
subsection (a) of this section and post information about the pain management access plan on the
carrier's publicly accessible website.
SECTION 5. Chapter 40-21 of the General Laws entitled "Medical Assistance —
Prescription Drugs" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
40-21-4. Access to nonopioid pain treatment.
(a) The Rhode Island medical assistance program, as defined under chapter 8 of this title,
and any contract between the Rhode Island medical assistance program and a managed care
organization, shall not apply any utilization review, including without limitation prior authorization
or step therapy protocols, for clinically appropriate nonopioid prescription drugs approved by the
United States Food and Drug Administration for the treatment or management of moderate to
severe pain, that is more restrictive or extensive than the least restrictive or extensive utilization
review applicable to any clinically appropriate opioid or narcotic drug.
(b) The Rhode Island medical assistance program shall require, through amending current
and future medical assistance managed care contracts, that managed care organizations meet the
provisions of this section.
LC005923/SUB A - Page 4 of 6

(c) This section applies to all policies, contracts, and plans executed, delivered, issued for
delivery, continued or renewed in this state on or after January 1, 2027.
SECTION 6. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005923/SUB A
========
LC005923/SUB A - Page 5 of 6